North Carolina, session 2025, SB665.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 5A. Upland Basins.
"§ 113A-129.10. Legislative findings; broad construction.
(a) The General Assembly finds that development of properly sited and planned upland
basins to accommodate vessels is preferable to open-water marinas for a number of reasons,
including all of the following:
(1) Increasing riparian property owner access to the State's public trust waters.
(2) Expanding the total area of the State's public trust waters.
(3) Reducing and confining potential storm debris.
(4) Reducing the need for additional onshore impervious surfaces associated with
parking.
(5) Promoting the use of innovative technologies.
(6) Promoting the collection of site-specific data designed to assure compliance
with applicable water quality standards.
(7) Maintaining or improving overall water quality when sited, designed,
constructed, and operated in conformance with the provisions of this Part.
(b) Accordingly, it is the intent of the General Assembly that this Part be broadly
construed to further the general purposes stated in this Part.
"§ 113A-129.11. Definitions.
As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:
(1) AEC or Area of Environmental Concern. – An area designated by the Coastal
Resources Commission pursuant to G.S. 113A-113.
(2) Boat slip. – Any structure adjoining, attached to, or part of a pier which has
the capacity to store one boat.
(3) Upland basin. – A marina constructed by excavating or dredging lands of
elevations above the current mean or ordinary high-water mark and designed
to accommodate more than ten vessels or boat slips. Upland basins shall be
considered a water dependent use for purposes of general use standards adopted
by the Coastal Resources Commission.
"§ 113A-129.12. Upland basin permitting and development.
(a) Unless the Director of the Division of Water Resources makes a finding, based on
site-specific technical information, that the applicant cannot substantially comply with one or
*S665-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
more of the criteria listed in subsection (b) of this section, the Division of Water Resources and
the Division of Coastal Management shall approve an application for the development of an
upland basin project, within 60 days after the applicant submits a completed application or
supplemental information requested by the Department to demonstrate substantial compliance
with all of the criteria set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The Department may make one
written request for any supplemental information necessary to make its finding within 30 days after
the applicant submits a complete application, and the permit may be conditioned upon measures
that are materially necessary to ensure that the applicant complies with all the criteria set forth in
subsection (b) of this section. When the Department requests supplemental information, the 60-day
review period restarts upon receipt of the supplemental information requested by the Department.
If the Department fails to act on an application for the development of an upland basin project
within the 60-day review period, the application shall be deemed approved.
(b) The criteria with which an upland basin shall comply to qualify for permitting pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section are all of the following:
(1) The upland basin is designed to accommodate ten or more vessels, including
individual homeowner boat slips, boat lifts, or dry stack storage.
(2) The waters contained in the upland basin have a dissolved oxygen content
equal to or greater than the dissolved oxygen content of the water located 50
feet plus or minus 5 feet from the entrance to the upland basin before
development. As part of the application, an applicant shall provide to the
Division of Water Resources and the Division of Coastal Management
site-specific sampling data documenting pre-project dissolved oxygen levels
of the water located 50 feet plus or minus 5 feet from each proposed entrance
to the proposed upland basin. Waters located within the upland basin shall be
classified the same as the waters in the immediate vicinity of any entrance to
the upland basin.
(3) The project has a bond or set-aside funds for the long-term operation and
maintenance of any technology required to meet or exceed then-applicable
water quality standards. The applicant shall provide an estimate of annual
operation and maintenance costs and the bond or set aside funds shall be equal
to five years of the estimated annual operation and maintenance costs.
(4) Construction of the upland basin impacts or removes a total area of coastal
wetlands that is no more than five percent (5%) of the total area of the
proposed upland basin waters.
(5) Construction of the upland basin impacts or removes a total linear footage of
coastal wetlands fringe that is no more than ten percent (10%) of the total
linear footage of existing coastal wetlands along the shoreline of the property
or properties of the permit applicant.
(6) The proposed upland basin project complies with specific use standards
adopted by the Coastal Resources Commission for navigation channels, canals
and boat basins. An upland basin project shall not be considered a "finger
canal" or "finger canal system" if the project does cot contain right angle
corners.
(7) The upland basin has a 30-foot vegetated buffer or buffers along the
post-project shoreline, excluding any newly created inside shorelines, if
required by the Department.
(8) The proposed upland basin project complies with specific use standards
adopted by the Coastal Resources Commission for marinas, with the following
exceptions:
Page 2 Senate Bill 665-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. An upland basin may be sited within an area where shellfish harvesting
for human consumption is a significant existing use or adjacent to such
areas.
b. Upland basin design is not required to comply with applicable
Environmental Management Commission requirements for
management of stormwater runoff. Stormwater management systems
may be located within the 30-foot buffer area.
(9) The project includes mitigation or has mitigation credits for wetland impacts
caused by excavation or construction of entrances, exits, and upland vessel
accommodation areas, where such entrances, exits, and upland vessel
accommodation areas exceed 125 linear feet of shoreline in total.
(10) The upland basin is sited and designed to avoid significant adverse impacts to
the productivity and biologic integrity of coastal wetlands, shellfish beds,
submerged aquatic vegetation, water quality, and spawning and primary
nursery areas. Substantial compliance with subdivisions (1) through (10) of
this subsection shall create a presumption that the project has avoided
significant adverse impacts to the productivity and biologic integrity of coastal
wetlands, non-coastal wetlands, shellfish beds, submerged aquatic vegetation,
water quality, spawning areas, and primary nursery areas and to have
complied with State water quality antidegradation requirements. Substantial
compliance constitutes appropriate avoidance of significant adverse
environmental impacts, including those identified in this Part.
(c) Once an upland basin developed and approved in accordance with this Part becomes
operational and continues to operate for at least 24 months, if the Director of the Division of
Water Resources determines that additional information is needed to assure long term
compliance with applicable water quality standards, the Division of Water Resources shall notify
the then-owner of that basin project to provide information materially necessary to address the
concerns raised by the Director.
(d) The submission of a Major Development Coastal Area Management Act (CAMA)
permit application for an upland basin project shall constitute a complete application for purposes
of water quality certification review by the Division of Water Resources. Unless the Director of
the Division of Water Resources objects in writing as provided in subsection (a) of this section,
no further information shall be required by the Department for purposes of evaluating whether
the upland basin project will substantially comply with water quality standards or CAMA use
standards referenced in this Part. Substantial compliance with the Major Development CAMA
permitting process shall also constitute compliance with all relevant provisions of Article 1 of
Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.
(e) The permit and any related authorizations or approvals issued for an upland basin
project pursuant to this Part shall be transferable.
(f) The Department shall allow an applicant for an upland basin project to use innovative
technology to maintain dissolved oxygen levels or improve dissolved oxygen above pre-project
ambient dissolved oxygen levels in the immediate vicinity of the entrance to the upland basin. If
the applicant proposes the use of innovative technology, the Department shall require the permit
holder to provide financial assurance, in the form of a bond or set-aside funds, for long-term
operation and maintenance of the innovative technology, in accordance with subdivision (b)(3)
of this section. If the applicant provides a certification from a North Carolina licensed
professional engineer that the proposed innovative technology is capable of attaining required
dissolved oxygen levels within the proposed upland basin, the Department shall not require any
additional information.
(g) In the absence of site-specific technical concerns provided to the applicant by the
Director of the Division of Water Resources based on information provided during the permit
Senate Bill 665-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
review process, an upland basin project that satisfies the criteria provided in subsection (b) of
this section shall be deemed to satisfy all of the following:
(1) The requirements for a State water quality certification pursuant to Section
401 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1341) and shall not require a written
concurrence from the Division of Water Resources, additional evaluation for
compliance with State water quality standards, or additional mitigation
requirements.
(2) CAMA management objectives and relevant use standards of the estuarine
and ocean system AECs.
(3) CAMA management objectives and use standards of the coastal wetlands
AEC.
(4) Water quality antidegradation standards as adopted by the Environmental
Management Commission.
(5) Wetland water quality standards, unless the United States Army Corps of
Engineers (Corps) or the United States Environmental Protection Agency
(EPA) provides site-specific information and comments to the contrary. In the
event of such comments from the Corps or EPA, the Department shall support
efforts by the applicant to satisfy any objections from the Corps or EPA
relative to the goals and benefits set forth in this Part.
(6) The policy goals stated in G.S. 113-102(b).
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate the Department's authority to
ensure long term compliance with applicable water quality standards in light of the goals and
requirements set forth in this Part. If data collected as part of the requirements of this Part, or
otherwise, indicate material noncompliance with applicable water quality standards in the waters
within the upland basin or adjacent waters within the vicinity of each entrance to the upland
basin, the Department may require the owner of the upland basin development at the time of the
noncompliance to bring the waters within the upland basin and adjacent waters into compliance
with applicable water quality standards, in light of the overall goals and policies set forth in this
Part to promote the construction and use of upland basins.
(h) Nothing in this section shall obviate the need for an applicant to obtain all relevant
federal permits required for the upland basin project."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 Senate Bill 665-First Edition